District of Columbia statutes.
2-578

Record of meetings.

(a)

All meetings of public bodies, whether open or closed, shall be recorded by electronic means; provided, that if a recording is not feasible, detailed minutes of the meeting shall be kept.

(b)

Copies of records shall be made available for public inspection according to the following schedule; provided, that a record, or a portion of a record, may be withheld under the standard established for closed meetings pursuant to § 2-575(b):

(1)

A copy of the minutes of a meeting shall be made available for public inspection as soon as practicable, but no later than 3 business days after the meeting.

(2)

A copy of the full record, including any recording or transcript, shall be made available for public inspection as soon as practicable, but no later than 7 business days after the meeting.

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title IV, § 408
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-350, § 2, 58 DCR 734